Washington statutes.
RCW 42.40.010

Policy.

It is the policy of the legislature that employees should be encouraged to disclose, to the extent not expressly prohibited by law, improper governmental actions, and it is the intent of the legislature to protect the rights of state employees making these disclosures, regardless of whether an investigation is initiated under RCW 42.40.040. It is also the policy of the legislature that employees should be encouraged to identify rules warranting review or provide information to the rules review committee, and it is the intent of the legislature to protect the rights of these employees.

[ 2017 c 44 s 1; 1995 c 403 s 508; 1982 c 208 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.